Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-655.01
State; jurisdiction over employer; when.

Employing one or more individuals to perform service within this state shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such employer in any action under sections 48-655 to 48-655.02.

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 14(2), p. 430;

Laws 1957, c. 208, § 6, p. 734;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 71.